Utah statutes.
53-3-224.   Filing a petition for hearing -- Judicial review of license cancellation, revocation, or suspension -- Scope of review.

(1)  A person denied a license or whose license has been cancelled, suspended, or revoked by the division following an administrative hearing may seek judicial review of the division's order.

(2) (a)  Venue for judicial review of informal adjudicative proceedings is in the district court in the county where the offense occurred, which resulted in the cancellation, suspension, or revocation.

(b)  Persons not residing in the state shall file in Salt Lake County or the county where the offense occurred, which resulted in the cancellation, suspension, or revocation.

